src/morphology/hacks/tagger-hacks.lexc
[WORD_ID=imettäviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0imettäviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=imettäville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0imettäville	#	;
[WORD_ID=imettäviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0imettäviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=imevien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0imevien	#	;
[WORD_ID=implantoitavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0implantoitavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=implantoitavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0implantoitavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=implantoitaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0implantoitaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=implantoitavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0implantoitavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=implantoivien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0implantoivien	#	;
[WORD_ID=inaktiiviseksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:0inaktiiviseksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=indeksiperusteisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0indeksiperusteisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=indikoivia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0indikoivia	#	;
[WORD_ID=indusoivilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0indusoivilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=infektoimattomaksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:0infektoimattomaksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=infektoivia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0infektoivia	#	;
[WORD_ID=infektoivien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0infektoivien	#	;
[WORD_ID=infektoiviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0infektoiviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=infektoivilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0infektoivilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=infopisteisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0infopisteisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=inhaloitavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0inhaloitavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=inhaloitaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0inhaloitaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=inhiboivien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0inhiboivien	#	;
[WORD_ID=innovaatiokykyinen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0innovaatiokykyinen	#	;
[WORD_ID=innovaatiokykyiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0innovaatiokykyiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=innovaatiopohjaiseen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0innovaatiopohjaiseen	#	;
[WORD_ID=innovointikykyisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0innovointikykyisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=innovoivia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0innovoivia	#	;
[WORD_ID=innovoivien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0innovoivien	#	;
[WORD_ID=innovoiville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0innovoiville	#	;
[WORD_ID=instrumenttikohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0instrumenttikohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=instrumenttikohtaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0instrumenttikohtaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=integroidummat][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=CMP][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0integroidummat	#	;
[WORD_ID=integroitavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0integroitavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=integroitumattomista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0integroitumattomista	#	;
[WORD_ID=-intensiivinen][POS=ADJECTIVE][COMPOUND_FORM=S][COMPOUND_FORM=OMIT]:0-intensiivinen	#	;
[WORD_ID=intensiivisemmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][POS=ADVERB][CMP=CMP]:0intensiivisemmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=investointikohtaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0investointikohtaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=investointikohtaisia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0investointikohtaisia	#	;
[WORD_ID=investointikykyisistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0investointikykyisistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=investoivia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0investoivia	#	;
[WORD_ID=investoivien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0investoivien	#	;
[WORD_ID=investoiville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0investoiville	#	;
[WORD_ID=ionisoituvien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0ionisoituvien	#	;
[WORD_ID=ionisoituville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0ionisoituville	#	;
[WORD_ID=irrotettavapäätyisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0irrotettavapäätyisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=irrotettavapäätyisille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0irrotettavapäätyisille	#	;
[WORD_ID=irrotettavapäätyisiä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0irrotettavapäätyisiä	#	;
[WORD_ID=irtisanomisehtoiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0irtisanomisehtoiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=irtisanomisehtoisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0irtisanomisehtoisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=irtisanottavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0irtisanottavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=irtoava][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0irtoava	#	;
[WORD_ID=irtoavat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0irtoavat	#	;
[WORD_ID=irtoavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0irtoavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=irtoavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0irtoavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=irtoavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0irtoavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=irtoteräiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0irtoteräiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=iskettävään][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0iskettävään	#	;
[WORD_ID=iskeytyvien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0iskeytyvien	#	;
[WORD_ID=istuinkohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0istuinkohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=istuntojaksokohtaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0istuntojaksokohtaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=istutettavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0istutettavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=istutettaville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0istutettaville	#	;
[WORD_ID=istuttaville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0istuttaville	#	;
[WORD_ID=isännöivien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0isännöivien	#	;
[WORD_ID=isännöiviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0isännöiviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=itseensä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL][POSS=3]:0itseensä	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsekseen][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA][POSS=3]:0itsekseen	#	;
[WORD_ID=itselleen][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL][POSS=3]:0itselleen	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsellään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE][POSS=3]:0itsellään	#	;
[WORD_ID=itseltämme][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL][POSS=PL1]:0itseltämme	#	;
[WORD_ID=itseltään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL][POSS=3]:0itseltään	#	;
[WORD_ID=itseni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN][POSS=SG1]:0itseni	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsensä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM][POSS=3]:0itsensä	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsensä][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN][POSS=3]:0itsensä	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsenäisemmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][POS=ADVERB][CMP=CMP]:0itsenäisemmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=itseoikeutettuina][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:0itseoikeutettuina	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsessäänkään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=INE][POSS=3][CLIT=KAAN]:0itsessäänkään	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsessään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=INE][POSS=3]:0itsessään	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsestään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA][POSS=3]:0itsestään	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsetoimivalla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:0itsetoimivalla	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsetoimivana][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:0itsetoimivana	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsetoimivan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0itsetoimivan	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsetoimiva][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0itsetoimiva	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsetoimivasta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:0itsetoimivasta	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsetoimivat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0itsetoimivat	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsetoimivia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0itsetoimivia	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsetoimivien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0itsetoimivien	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsetoimiviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0itsetoimiviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsetoimivilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0itsetoimivilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsetoimiville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0itsetoimiville	#	;
[WORD_ID=itsevaltaisimmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][POS=ADVERB][CMP=SUP]:0itsevaltaisimmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=itseäni][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR][POSS=SG1]:0itseäni	#	;
[WORD_ID=itseäsi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR][POSS=SG2]:0itseäsi	#	;
[WORD_ID=itseään][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=REFLEX][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR][POSS=3]:0itseään	#	;
[WORD_ID=itämiskykyisiksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:0itämiskykyisiksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=itämättömien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0itämättömien	#	;
[WORD_ID=itävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0itävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=itäviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0itäviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=itäviksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:0itäviksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=itävistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0itävistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=jakaantumattoman][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0jakaantumattoman	#	;
[WORD_ID=jakaantuvia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0jakaantuvia	#	;
[WORD_ID=jakautumiskykyisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0jakautumiskykyisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=jakautumiskykyisiä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0jakautumiskykyisiä	#	;
[WORD_ID=jakautumiskykyisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0jakautumiskykyisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=jakautuvista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0jakautuvista	#	;
[WORD_ID=jakelevien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0jakelevien	#	;
[WORD_ID=jakelupisteisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0jakelupisteisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=jakoperusteisille][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0jakoperusteisille	#	;
[WORD_ID=jakopisteisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0jakopisteisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=jaksokohtaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0jaksokohtaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=jaksottaisin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:0jaksottaisin	#	;
[WORD_ID=jaksottamattomien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0jaksottamattomien	#	;
[WORD_ID=jaksottamattomista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0jaksottamattomista	#	;
[WORD_ID=jalkakäyttöinen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0jalkakäyttöinen	#	;
[WORD_ID=jalkakäyttöisellä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:0jalkakäyttöisellä	#	;
[WORD_ID=jalkakäyttöiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0jalkakäyttöiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=jalkakäyttöisillä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0jalkakäyttöisillä	#	;
[WORD_ID=jalkakäyttöisiä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0jalkakäyttöisiä	#	;
[WORD_ID=jalometallipitoiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0jalometallipitoiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=jalostettavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0jalostettavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=jalostettavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0jalostettavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=jalostettaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0jalostettaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=jalostettaviksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:0jalostettaviksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=jalostettaville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0jalostettaville	#	;
[WORD_ID=jalostettavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0jalostettavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=jalostusasteisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0jalostusasteisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=jaostokohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0jaostokohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=jarrukohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0jarrukohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=jarruttamattoman][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0jarruttamattoman	#	;
[WORD_ID=jarruttavaan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0jarruttavaan	#	;
[WORD_ID=jarruttavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0jarruttavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=jarruttavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0jarruttavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=jarruttaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0jarruttaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=jatkavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0jatkavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=jatkaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0jatkaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=jatkaville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0jatkaville	#	;
[WORD_ID=jatkettavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0jatkettavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=jatkettaville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0jatkettaville	#	;
[WORD_ID=jauhettavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0jauhettavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=jauhettaville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0jauhettaville	#	;
[WORD_ID=jauhopohjaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0jauhopohjaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=-johdannainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][COMPOUND_FORM=S][COMPOUND_FORM=OMIT]:0-johdannainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=johdettavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0johdettavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=johdettavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0johdettavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=johdettaville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0johdettaville	#	;
[WORD_ID=johdettavilta][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:0johdettavilta	#	;
[WORD_ID=johdinpohjaisia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0johdinpohjaisia	#	;
[WORD_ID=johdonmukaisemmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][POS=ADVERB][CMP=CMP]:0johdonmukaisemmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=johtamattomien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0johtamattomien	#	;
[WORD_ID=johtokykyisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0johtokykyisen	#	;
